District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.13

Repealed

Jurisdiction to modify child support order of another state when individual parties reside in the District.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 613
as added July 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-131, § 2(m), 45 DCR 2924
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 145, 47 DCR 520
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 613 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(m) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-310, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1950).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2(m) of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-225, December 23, 1997, 45 DCR 151).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(m) of Uniform Interstate Family Support Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-94, April 29, 1998, law notification 45 DCR).
D.C. Law 13-91 deleted the phrase “of this chapter” following the enumeration of subchapters.
1981 Ed., § 30-346.13.
This section is referenced in § 46-306.10 and § 46-306.11.